District of Columbia statutes.
44-753

Creation of lien in favor of United States.

The provisions of the paragraph following the appropriation for the Washington Hospital for Foundlings in § 44-711, creating a lien in favor of the United States with respect to the appropriations referred to therein, shall also apply to the appropriations in the aggregate amount of $50,000, granted in the Act of June 10, 1872 (17 Stat. 360), and in the Act of March 3, 1875 (18 Stat. 386), for the purchase by the United States of the property described in § 44-751, and the acceptance by the Columbia Hospital for Women and Lying-in Asylum of the conveyance of said property shall be deemed an acceptance of and agreement to this provision.

June 28, 1952, 66 Stat. 288, ch. 486, § 3

History

1981 Ed., § 32-122.
1973 Ed., § 32-325.

Prior Codifications